Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1662.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVI-Z.1PENNSYLVANIA CHILD LEARNINGINVESTMENT TAX CREDIT PROGRAMSection 1601-Z.1. Scope of article.This article relates to the Pennsylvania Child Learning Investment Tax Credit Program.Section 1602-Z.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Eligible child." A child of school-age who:(1) has not yet received a high school diploma;(2) currently resides within the attendance boundary of a public school;(3) is eligible to attend a school district under the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949; and(4) is not enrolled in a public school for the taxable year."Nonpublic school." As defined under section 923.3-A of the Public School Code of 1949."Public school." As defined under section 1101-B of the Public School Code of 1949."Qualified learning expenses." Expenses incurred by a 20250HB1662PN2030 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 taxpayer that is a parent or legal guardian of an eligible child, including:(1) Tuition and fees at a nonpublic school.(2) Textbooks or curriculum materials.(3) Fees for after-school or summer education programs provided by a nonpublic school.(4) Tutoring services.(5) Educational software and applications.(6) Fees for standardized and nationally recognized tests, including college admissions tests and advanced placement examinations and related preparatory courses.(7) Education services for students with disabilities from a licensed or accredited practitioner or education service provider.(8) Contracted services provided by a public school district, including specific classroom instruction."Tax credit." The Pennsylvania Child Learning Investment Tax Credit provided for under this article."Tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971, excluding any tax withheld by an employer under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Tax Reform Code of 1971." The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Taxable year." As defined under section 301 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Taxpayer." A resident individual subject to the tax imposed under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 1603-Z.1. Credit for child learning investment expenses.20250HB1662PN2030 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Creation of tax credit.--For each taxable year beginning after December 31, 2025, a taxpayer shall be allowed a tax credit against the tax imposed under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for each eligible child who is not enrolled in a public school for the taxable year to be used for qualified learning expenses.(b) Amount.--The credit shall be $8,000 per child per taxable year.(c) Claim of tax credit.--A taxpayer shall claim a tax credit under this section on a return filed under section 330 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(d) Tax credit refund.--The tax credit under this section shall be applied against the taxpayer's tax liability. If the tax credit exceeds the taxpayer's tax liability, the department shall issue a refund under the procedures specified in section 346 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(e) Prorating of tax credit.--In the case of a child enrolled in a public school for a portion of the taxable year and in a nonpublic school for a portion of the taxable year, the amount of the credit awarded to the taxpayer shall be prorated.(f) Distribution of tax credit.--(1) The department shall allow taxpayers to claim the credit when filing an annual tax return or through advanced installments.(2) The department shall prescribe applications for the purposes of claiming the credits in advance and a deadline by which applications for the advance shall be submitted.(3) A taxpayer shall choose to receive the credit:(i) as a direct deposit electronically to a banking account provided by the taxpayer; or20250HB1662PN2030 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) by certified mail to a legal address.Section 1604-Z.1. Regulations.The Secretary of Revenue may issue rules and promulgate regulations necessary to implement and administer this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1662PN2030 - 5 - 12345